Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1225
Rural public power supplier, defined.

Rural public power supplier means a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, an electric cooperative, or an electric membership association, that does not provide electric service to any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, or city of the first class.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 25.